Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 5. Adult Adoption.

§ 63.2-1243.
Adoption of certain persons eighteen years of age or over.

A petition may be filed in circuit court by any natural person who is a resident of this Commonwealth (i) for the adoption of a stepchild eighteen years of age or over to whom he has stood in loco parentis for a period of at least three months; (ii) for the adoption of a close relative, as defined in §

63.2-1242.1

, eighteen years of age or older; (iii) for the adoption of any person eighteen years of age or older who is the birth child of the petitioner or who had resided in the home of the petitioner for a period of at least three months prior to becoming eighteen years of age; or (iv) for the adoption of any person eighteen years of age or older, for good cause shown, provided that the person to be adopted is at least fifteen years younger than the petitioner and the petitioner and the person to be adopted have known each other for at least one year prior to the filing of the petition for adoption. Proceedings in any such case shall conform as near as may be to proceedings for the adoption of a minor child under this chapter except that:

No consent of either parent shall be required; and

The consent of the person to be adopted shall be required in all cases.

Any interlocutory or final order issued in any case under this section shall have the same effect as other orders issued under this chapter; and in any such case the word “child” in any other section of this chapter shall be construed to refer to the person whose adoption is petitioned for under this section. The entry of a final order of adoption pursuant to this section which incorporates a change of name shall be deemed to meet the requirements of §

8.01-217

.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any person who would have been eligible for adoption hereunder prior to July 1, 1972.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348.1; 1950, p. 441; 1954, c. 489; 1964, c. 139; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-222; 1972, c. 823; 1974, c. 337; 1979, c. 339; 1985, cc. 298, 300; 1988, c. 53; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.50; 2001, c. 236; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848.

Cross references.

As to investigation and report upon petitions for adoption of certain persons over the age of 18, see §

63.2-1244

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are virtually identical, and in the introductory paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “‘close relative’ as defined in §

63.2-1242.1

” for “niece or nephew over” and “or older” for “who has no living parents and who has lived in the home of the petitioner for at least three months” in clause (ii), and “one year” for “five years” and deleted the proviso from the end of clause (iv), which formerly read: “and provided further that both the petitioner and the person to be adopted have been residents of the Commonwealth for at least two years immediately prior to the filing of the petition.” Acts 2006, c. 848, is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Good cause for adoption not found. —

Parties offered no evidence showing “good cause” for petitioner’s adoption of two adults, a citizen of El Salvador and a citizen of Turkey; the adoptions would enable the adoptees to continue in the United States and live with petitioner, but no other reason was given or could be discerned from the record, so the adoption was denied. In re Castillo, 67 Va. Cir. 22, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 5 (Spotsylvania County Jan. 25, 2005).

§ 63.2-1244.
Investigation and report at discretion of circuit court; exception.

For adoptions under this article, an investigation and report shall not be made unless the circuit court in its discretion so requires. If an investigation is required, the circuit court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits to the local director and the provisions of §

63.2-1208

shall apply.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348.1; 1950, p. 441; 1954, c. 489; 1964, c. 139; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-222; 1972, c. 823; 1974, c. 337; 1979, c. 339; 1985, cc. 298, 300; 1988, c. 53; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.51; 2002, c. 747; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 202.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 202, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “However, if a petition is filed for the adoption of any person eighteen years of age or older under clause (iv) of §

63.2-1243

, the circuit court shall require an investigation and report to be made.”